Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BLACK WOMEN'S WEALTH ALLIANCE.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Black Women's Wealth Alliance to provide individuals with job skills training, career counseling, and career placement assistance. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end